North Dakota, session 69, HB1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
agriculture commissioner for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the agriculture commissioner, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $17,042,562 $933,974 $17,976,536
New and vacant FTE pool 0 754,477 754,477
Operating expenses 7,426,173 588,083 8,014,256
Capital assets 7,000 4,100 11,100
Grants 10,953,969 7,141,300 18,095,269
Agricultural products utilization 2,110,417 3,000,000 5,110,417
commission
North Dakota trade office 1,600,000 400,000 2,000,000
Board of animal health 865,718 (8,357) 857,361
Wildlife services 1,657,400 150,000 1,807,400
Pipeline restoration and reclamation 200,000 (200,000) 0
oversight program
Pipeline and royalty oversight programs 0 500,000 500,000
Crop harmonization board 75,000 0 75,000
Total all funds $41,938,239 $13,263,577 $55,201,816
Less other funds 27,117,306 11,455,034 38,572,340
Total general fund $14,820,933 $1,808,543 $16,629,476
Full-time equivalent positions 80.00 1.00 81.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
General Fund Other Funds Total
Agricultural products utilization commission $0 $3,000,000 $3,000,000
Grasslands grazing grants 0 3,000,000 3,000,000
Food distribution grants 0 1,500,000 1,500,000
Autonomous technology grants 0 300,000 300,000
North Dakota trade office 400,000 0 400,000
Total $400,000 $7,800,000 $8,200,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
agriculture commissioner may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item

H. B. NO. 1009 - PAGE 2
in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - TRANSFER - DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES. The other
funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $125,000 which the department of water
resources shall transfer to the agriculture commissioner for the purpose of defraying the expenses of
the wildlife services program.
SECTION 5. TRANSFER - ENVIRONMENT AND RANGELAND PROTECTION FUND - MINOR
USE PESTICIDE FUND. The agriculture commissioner shall transfer $325,000 from the environment
and rangeland protection fund to the minor use pesticide fund during the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. TRANSFER - ENVIRONMENT AND RANGELAND PROTECTION FUND TO
ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT MITIGATION FUND - MITIGATION OF AGRICULTURAL LAND. The
agriculture commissioner shall transfer $250,000 from the environment and rangeland protection fund
to the environmental impact mitigation fund for the purpose of mitigation of agricultural land under
section 4.1-01-21.1, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. TRANSFER - BIOSCIENCE INNOVATION GRANT FUND TO GENERAL FUND. The
office of management and budget shall transfer any balance in the bioscience innovation grant fund to
the general fund on June 30, 2025.
SECTION 8. OTHER FUNDS - TRANSFER - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA PROFITS -
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS UTILIZATION COMMISSION. The other funds line item in section 1 of
this Act includes the sum of $3,000,000 which the Bank of North Dakota shall transfer from the Bank's
current earnings and undivided profits to the agriculture commissioner for deposit in the agricultural
products utilization fund for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the agricultural products utilization
commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 9. OTHER FUNDS - ENVIRONMENT AND RANGELAND PROTECTION FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $8,057,927 from the environment and
rangeland protection fund for the purpose of defraying the expenses of various agriculture
commissioner programs.
SECTION 10. OTHER FUNDS - GAME AND FISH FUND. The other funds line item in section 1 of
this Act includes the sum of $671,918 from the game and fish department operating fund for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of various agriculture commissioner programs.
SECTION 11. OTHER FUNDS - ABANDONED OIL AND GAS WELL PLUGGING AND SITE
RECLAMATION FUND. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $500,000
from the abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund, of which $200,000 is for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the pipeline restoration and reclamation program and $300,000 is
for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the postproduction royalty oversight program.
SECTION 12. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
MATCHING FUNDS - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT. The other funds line item in
section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $4,800,000 from the strategic investment and improvements
fund, of which:
1. $3,000,000 is for the purpose of providing grassland grazing grants to an organization
representing cooperative grazing associations in the state. To be eligible for a grant under this
program, an organization must provide one dollar of matching funds from nonstate sources for
every four dollars of grant funding. An organization that receives a grant under this program
may distribute the funding to cooperative grazing associations for eligible infrastructure
projects, which must be located on national grasslands within the state. Eligible infrastructure

H. B. NO. 1009 - PAGE 3
projects include water development; fencing; conservation initiatives; compliance with federal
permitting requirements, including fees for professional services; and other projects to
enhance wildlife habitat, capture carbon, or increase the health of grasslands. Program
participants shall develop and implement a grazing land plan in compliance with local soil
conservation district guidance and the plan must be approved by the local soil conservation
district. The agriculture commissioner shall establish additional guidelines for the program;
2. $1,500,000 is for grants to food pantries for meat and protein-related purchases; and
3. $300,000 is for autonomous technology grants to individuals or entities in the agriculture
industry, as follows:
a. For purposes of this subsection, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft
systems, autonomous vehicles, or other autonomous systems, processes, or
technologies.
b. The agriculture commissioner shall develop an application process and guidelines for the
grants, including eligibility criteria, matching requirements, eligible uses of grant funding,
and maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant, an individual or entity shall certify
to the agriculture commissioner that the operation of the autonomous technology is
related to the inspection, operation, maintenance, or construction of agriculture property
or infrastructure. The agriculture commissioner may require an individual or entity to
provide one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. An
individual or entity may use grant funding for autonomous technology operations,
contracting for services related to autonomous technology, or other eligible uses as
determined by the agriculture commissioner.
c. During the 2025-26 interim, the agriculture commissioner shall provide at least one report
to the legislative management regarding the autonomous technology grants, including a
list of grant recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant
funding.
SECTION 13. TRADE OFFICE - MATCHING FUND REQUIREMENT. The North Dakota trade
office line item and the general fund appropriation in section 1 of this Act include $2,000,000 of funding
related to the North Dakota trade office. The agriculture commissioner may spend sixty percent of this
amount without requiring any matching funds from the trade office. Any additional amounts may be
spent only to the extent the North Dakota trade office provides one dollar of matching funds from private
or other public sources for each one dollar provided by the agriculture commissioner. Matching funds
may include money spent by businesses or organizations to pay salaries to export assistants, provide
training to export assistants, or purchase computer equipment as part of the North Dakota trade office's
export assistant program.
SECTION 14. WATERBANK PROGRAM - MATCHING FUNDS. The salaries and wages line item
in section 1 of this Act includes up to $50,000 from the general fund for matching funds for the North
Dakota outdoor heritage fund grant provided for the waterbank program.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-01-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-01-02. Salary of agriculture commissioner.
The annual salary of the agriculture commissioner is one hundred thirty-one thousand four hundred
twenty-three dollars through June 30, 2024, and one hundred thirty-six thousand six hundred eightyone
hundred forty thousand seven hundred eighty dollars through June 30, 2026, and one hundred forty-five
thousand three dollars after that date.
SECTION 16. WILDLIFE SERVICES PROGRAM - INDIRECT COSTS. The wildlife services line
item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $1,807,400 for the purpose of defraying the expenses of

H. B. NO. 1009 - PAGE 4
the wildlife services program during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
The agriculture commissioner may not use funding appropriated for the program to pay indirect costs as
part of the United States department of agriculture animal and plant health inspection service wildlife
services program.
SECTION 17. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. The sum of $300,000 appropriated from federal funds derived from COVID-19 funds for the
specialty crop block grant program during the 2019-21 biennium in section 1 of chapter 27 of
the 2021 Session Laws, and continued into the 2021-23 biennium in section 2 of chapter 27 of
the 2021 Session Laws and the 2023-25 biennium in section 20 of chapter 41 of the 2023
Session Laws;
2. The sum of $5,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
grasslands grazing grants in the grants line item in section 1 of chapter 9 of the 2021 Session
Laws, and continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 21 of chapter 41 of the 2023
Session Laws;
3. The sum of $660,000 appropriated from the environment and rangeland protection fund for the
regional livestock development and planning program in section 2 of chapter 76 of the 2023
Session Laws; and
4. The sum of $1,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
grasslands grazing grants in the grants line item in section 1 of chapter 41 of the 2023
Session Laws.
SECTION 18. EMERGENCY. Section 7 of this Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1009 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1009 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 76 Nays 13 Absent 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State